Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2625XC (3) 91 jm/md S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 441.72, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 441.72 Assessment of platted lots development property . 3 1. a. Except as provided in subsection 2 , when a 4 subdivision plat is recorded pursuant to chapter 354 , the 5 individual lots within the subdivision plat shall not be 6 assessed in excess of the total assessment of the land as 7 acreage or unimproved property for five years after the 8 recording of the plat or until the lot is actually improved 9 with permanent construction, whichever occurs first. When an 10 individual lot has been improved with permanent construction, 11 the lot shall be assessed for taxation purposes as provided 12 in chapter 428 and this chapter . Property acquired for 13 development on or after January 1, 2020, or property owned 14 for development upon which development activities occur on or 15 after January 1, 2020, shall continue to be classified and 16 assessed for taxation in the manner the property was prior to 17 the acquisition or commencement of development activities. The 18 assessor shall not change the classification or assessment of 19 the property or a lot on the property while development is 20 occurring until the property or lot is improved with a new 21 permanent structure, sold, or five years have elapsed from the 22 date the subdivision plat is recorded pursuant to chapter 354, 23 if applicable. Upon the occurrence of one or more such events, 24 the property or lot shall be assessed for taxation purposes as 25 provided in chapter 428 and this chapter. 26 b. As used in this subsection, âdevelopmentâ means any of 27 the following: 28 (1) A reconstruction, alteration of the size or material 29 change in the external appearance of an existing structure on 30 a lot. 31 (2) A change in the intensity of the use of lots or a change 32 in zoning, including an increase in the number of dwelling 33 units in an existing structure, or further subdividing the 34 lots to increase the number of dwelling units, commercial 35 -1- LSB 2625XC (3) 91 jm/md 1/ 4 S.F. _____ structures, manufacturing establishments, or offices. 1 (3) Clearing the lots in anticipation of construction. 2 (4) Depositing fill dirt on the lots in anticipation of 3 construction. 4 (5) Installing streets and public utilities on the lots. 5 2. For subdivision plats recorded pursuant to chapter 6 354 on or after January 1, 2004, but before January 1, 2011, 7 the individual lots within the subdivision plat shall not 8 be assessed in excess of the total assessment of the land 9 as acreage or unimproved property for eight years after the 10 recording of the plat or until the lot is actually improved 11 with permanent construction, whichever occurs first. When an 12 individual lot has been improved with permanent construction, 13 the lot shall be assessed for taxation purposes as provided in 14 chapter 428 and this chapter . 15 3. 2. This section does not apply to special assessment 16 levies. 17 Sec. 2. REPEAL. Section 405.1, Code 2025, is repealed. 18 Sec. 3. IMPLEMENTATION. Nothing in this Act shall be 19 construed to require the refund or modification of property 20 taxes that are attributable to assessment years beginning 21 before January 1, 2025, or the adjustment of property 22 assessments for assessment years beginning before January 1, 23 2025. 24 Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 25 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 26 Sec. 5. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 27 retroactively to assessment years beginning on or after January 28 1, 2025. 29